Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2106
Exemptions from act.

The Membership Campground Act shall not apply to the following transactions:

(1) The offer, sale, or transfer by any one person of not more than one membership camping contract in any twelve-month period;

(2) The offer or sale by a government, government agency, or other subdivision of government;

(3) The bona fide pledge of a membership camping contract; and

(4) Transactions subject to regulation pursuant to the Nebraska Time-Share Act.

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB152, § 3.

Nebraska Time-Share Act, see section 76-1701.